Arkansas, session 2025, HB1799.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 12-18-302(a), concerning permissible
methods for reporting under the Child Maltreatment Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(a) As prescribed under this section, a mandated reporter under this
chapter may report child maltreatment or suspected child maltreatment by
telephone call, facsimile transmission, or online reporting.

/s/Vaught








*LJH236*
03-20-2025 09:39:43 LJH236